Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.216.505 and 2021 c 199 s 204 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.216.500 through 43.216.559, 43.216.900, and 43.216.901.(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW 43.216.520.(2) "Approved programs" means those state-supported education and special assistance programs which are recognized by the department as meeting the minimum program rules adopted by the department to qualify under RCW 43.216.500 through 43.216.550, 43.216.900, and 43.216.901 and are designated as eligible for funding by the department under RCW 43.216.530 and 43.216.540.(3) "Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the needs of the child and includes education, health, and family support services.(4) "Eligible child" means a three to five-year old child who is not age-eligible for kindergarten, is not a participant in a federal or state program providing comprehensive services, and who:(a) Has a family with financial need;(b) Is experiencing homelessness;(c) Has participated in early head start or a successor federal program providing comprehensive services for children from birth through two years of age, the early support for infants and toddlers program or received class C developmental services, the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program, or the early childhood intervention and prevention services program;(d) Is eligible for special education due to disability under RCW 28A.155.020;(e) Is Indian as defined in rule by the department after consultation and agreement with Washington state's federally recognized tribes pursuant to RCW 43.216.5052 and is at or below 100 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size; or(f) Meets criteria under rules adopted by the department if the number of such children equals not more than ten percent of the total enrollment in the early childhood program. Preference for enrollment in this group shall be given to children from families with the lowest income, children in foster care, or to eligible children from families with multiple needs.(5) "Experiencing homelessness" means a child without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as described in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act (Title 42 U.S.C., chapter 119, subchapter VI, part B) as it existed on January 1, 2021.(6) "Family support services" means providing opportunities for parents to:(a) Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;(b) Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting skills;(c) Further their education and training;(d) Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;(e) Increase their self-reliance; and(f) Connect with culturally competent, disability positive therapists and supports where appropriate.(7) "Family with financial need" means families with incomes at or below 36 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size until the ((2030-31))2034-35 school year. Beginning in the ((2030-31))2034-35 school year, "family with financial need" means families with incomes at or below 50 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size.Sec. 2. RCW 43.216.556 and 2021 c 199 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Funding for the program of early learning established under this chapter must be appropriated to the department. The department shall distribute funding to approved early childhood education and assistance program contractors on the basis of eligible children enrolled.(2) The program shall be implemented in phases, so that full implementation is achieved in the ((2026-27))2030-31 school year.(3) Funding shall continue to be phased in each year until full statewide implementation of the early learning program is achieved in the ((2026-27))2030-31 school year, at which time any eligible child is entitled to be enrolled in the program. Entitlement under this section is voluntary enrollment.(4) School districts and approved community-based early learning providers may contract with the department to provide services under the program. The department shall collaborate with school districts, community-based providers, and educational service districts to promote an adequate supply of approved providers.Sec. 3. RCW 43.216.802 and 2024 c 225 s 1 and 2024 c 67 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to increase working families' access to affordable, high quality child care and to support the expansion of the workforce to support businesses and the statewide economy.(2) A family is eligible for working connections child care when the household's annual income is at or below 60 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and:(a) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(b) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter.(3) Beginning July 1, ((2025))2029, a family is eligible for working connections child care when the household's annual income is above 60 percent and at or below 75 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and:(a) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(b) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter.(4) Beginning July 1, ((2027))2031, and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, a family is eligible for working connections child care when the household's annual income is above 75 percent of the state median income and is at or below 85 percent of the state median income adjusted for family size and:(a) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(b) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter.(5) Beginning November 1, 2024, when an applicant or consumer is a member of an assistance unit that is eligible for or receiving basic food benefits under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program or the state food assistance program the department must determine that the household income eligibility requirements in this section are met.(6) The department must adopt rules to implement this section, including an income phase-out eligibility period.(7) The department may not consider the citizenship status of an applicant or consumer's child when determining eligibility for working connections child care benefits.(8) The income eligibility requirements in subsections (2) through (4) of this section do not apply to households eligible for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.808, 43.216.810, 43.216.812, and 43.216.814.Sec. 4. RCW 43.216.810 and 2024 c 67 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An applicant or consumer is eligible to receive working connections child care benefits for the care of one or more eligible children for the first 12 months of the applicant's or consumer's enrollment in a state registered apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW when:(a) The applicant or consumer's household annual income adjusted for family size does not exceed 75 percent of the state median income at the time of application, or, beginning July 1, ((2027))2031, does not exceed 85 percent of the state median income if funds are appropriated for the purpose of RCW 43.216.802(4);(b) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and either has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and(c) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department in accordance with RCW 43.216.055, 43.216.065, and 43.216.800.(2) The department must adopt a copayment model for benefits granted under this ((subsection [section]))section, which must align with any copayment identified or adopted for households with the same income level under RCW 43.216.804.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.Sec. 6. 2024 c 225 s 7 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:Section 2 of this act takes effect August 1, ((2030))2034.Sections 4 and 6 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---